fr: Zones d’adhérence: Adhérence sur tout le pied; Adhérence au talon; Sans adhérence; Adhérence à la semelle; Autre
en: Grip coverage: Full foot grip; Heel grip; No grip; Sole grip; Other
cs: Krytí úchopu: Grip na celém chodidle; Grip na patě; Bez gripu; Grip na podrážce; Ostatní
de: Griffabdeckung: Ganzer Fuß Grip; Fersengrip; Kein Grip; Sohlengrip; Sonstige
pt-PT: Cobertura de aderência: Aderência total do pé; Aderência do calcanhar; Sem aderência; Aderência da sola; Outra
sv: Grepptäckning: Grepp för hela foten; Hälgrepp; Inget grepp; Sulgrepp; Övrigt
sk-SK: Pokrytie úchopu: Grip na celom chodidle; Grip na päte; Bez gripu; Grip na podrážke; Iné
hr-HR: Pokrivenost hvata: Prianjanje preko cijelog stopala; Prianjanje na peti; Bez gripa; Prianjanje na potplatu; Ostalo
da: Dækning af greb: Greb under hele foden; Hælgreb; Intet greb; Sålgreb; Andet
pt-BR: Aderência cobertura: Grip no pé inteiro; Grip no calcanhar; Sem grip; Grip na sola; Outro
ro-RO: Acoperire a aderenței: Aderență pe toată talpa; Aderență pe călcâi; Fără aderență; Aderență pe talpă; Altele
zh-TW: 防滑覆蓋範圍: 全腳掌止滑; 腳跟止滑; 無止滑; 鞋底止滑; 其他
nb: Grepdekning: Grep for hele foten; Hælgrep; Uten grep; Sålegrep; Annet
ru: Зона покрытия противоскользящими элементами: На всю стопу; На пятке; Без сцепления; На подошве; Другое
lt-LT: Sukibimo padengimas: Visos pėdos sukibimas; Kulno sukibimas; Be sukibimo; Pado sukibimas; Kita
th: การครอบคลุมการยึดเกาะ: กริปเต็มเท้า; กริปส้นเท้า; ไม่มีกริป; กริปฝ่าเท้า; อื่นๆ
fi: Pitokyky: Koko jalan pito; Kantapääpito; Ei pitoa; Pohjapito; Muu
nl: Gripdekking: Volledige voetgrip; Hielgrip; Geen grip; Zoolgrip; Overig
el: Κάλυψη λαβής: Λαβή σε όλο το πέλμα; Λαβή στη φτέρνα; Χωρίς λαβή; Λαβή στη σόλα; Άλλο
ja: グリップカバー: フルフットグリップ; ヒールグリップ; グリップなし; ソールグリップ; その他
hu: Tapadási lefedettség: Teljes talpas tapadás; Saroktapadás; Nincs tapadás; Talptapadás; Egyéb
tr: Kavrama kapsamı: Tam ayak tutuşu; Topuk tutuşu; Tutuş yok; Taban tutuşu; Diğer
es: Cobertura de agarre: Agarre para todo el pie; Agarre en el talón; Sin agarre; Agarre en la suela; Otro
vi: Độ bám: Đệm bám toàn bàn chân; Đệm bám gót chân; Không đệm bám; Đệm bám đế giày; Khác
zh-CN: 防滑覆盖区域: 全脚掌防滑; 脚跟防滑; 无防滑; 鞋底防滑; 其他
bg-BG: Покритие на захвата: Захват на цялото стъпало; Захват на петата; Без захват; Захват на подметката; Друго
ko: 그립 적용 범위: 발 전체 그립; 뒤꿈치 그립; 그립 없음; 발바닥 그립; 기타
it: Coperture di presa: Grip su tutto il piede; Grip sul tallone; Nessun grip; Grip sulla suola; Altro
sl-SI: Pokritost oprijemalne površine: Oprijem po celem stopalu; Oprijem na peti; Brez oprijema; Oprijem na podplatu; Drugo
pl: Pokrycie antypoślizgowe: Pełna przyczepność stopy; Przyczepność na pięcie; Brak przyczepności; Przyczepność na podeszwie; Inne